test/src/morphology/N-tariil_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tarīļ: # Noun 239 'eng /est taldrik/fin' - full paradigm
     tarīļ+N+Sg+Nom: tarīļ
     tarīļ+N+Sg+Gen: tarīļ
     tarīļ+N+Sg+Par: tarīļt
     tarīļ+N+Sg+Dat: tarīļõn
     tarīļ+N+Sg+Ins: tarīļõks
     tarīļ+N+Sg+Ill: tarīļõ
     tarīļ+N+Sg+Ela: tarīļšt
     tarīļ+N+Pl+Nom: tarīļd
     tarīļ+N+Pl+Gen: tarīļd
     tarīļ+N+Pl+Par: tarīļi
     tarīļ+N+Pl+Dat: tarīļdõn
     tarīļ+N+Pl+Ins: tarīļdõks
     tarīļ+N+Pl+Ill: tarīļiž
     tarīļ+N+Pl+Ela: tarīļist

									
